Illinois, session 104th, SB834.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Fair Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 210/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1701)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"State Fair Act". 9(Source: P.A. 81-853.)